public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
inakuar/A
inalborar/A
alŧar/A
analiđar/A
reanemar/A
ardentar/A
arxinar/A
inarpeđar/A
astiar/A
aŧidar/A
autoridar/A
inaxolar/A
bagatelar/A
inbaɉokar/A
inbaƚar/A
baƚegar/A
inbalonar/A
inbalsemar/A
baƚuxenar/A
xbandonar/A
xbarakar/A
xbarbatoƚar/A
xbarlúxer/A
inbastardir/A
dexbatiđar/A
xbaŧegar/A
inbavarar/A
xbefar/A
inbeƚetar/A
bertonar/A
inbeverar/A
xbiankedar/A
bibiar/A
skonbinar/A
dexbirar/A
bixar/A
inbogar/A
rebojir/A
xbokolar/A
bolsar/A
inbonbar/A
xborar/A
inboreŧar/A
inboskajar/A
xbotonar/A
inbosoƚar/A
bragañar/A
bramixar/A
xbrasar/A
inbrenar/A
xbrindolar/A
inbroɉar/A
bronboƚar/A
brunir/A
bueƚar/A
busar/A
inbuŧolar/A
xbuxoƚar/A
scaređar/A
cekoƚar/A
recèñer/A
incepar/A
cincinar/A
cokolatar/A
maƚedir/A
dasiar/A
dentelar/A
indevenar/A
xdindoƚar/A
dixertar/A
doƚer/A
indomar/A
dexdopiar/A
dexdoronar/A
dresar/A
kondurir/A
inxalir/A
xavajar/A
xogar/A
malxontar/A
sođónxer/A
rinđovenar/A
xuƚar/A
ebraixar/A
elèđer/A
entrar/A
esplòder/A
exebir/A
dexasuefar/A
desfabrikar/A
sfaldar/A
falŧidiar/A
fanfruñar/A
farsir/A
faŧendar/A
favoriđar/A
palifegar/A
efeltrir/A
ferir/A
konfermar/A
sfetar/A
fiankonar/A
afidar/A
filar/A
sfilaŧar/A
infiokar/A
fioŧinar/A
infistegar/A
sfodegar/A
fojar/A
infolponar/A
sforbexar/A
formalixar/A
forŧar/A
fradeƚar/A
sfranpuñar/A
infrapolir/A
fraturar/A
fregar/A
fríder/A
sfrixar/A
sfruñar/A
refujar/A
furegar/A
refuxir/A
gaƚanteɉar/A
ingaƚetar/A
ingamelar/A
inganŧar/A
ingarbeƚar/A
garofolir/A
ingavar/A
gindar/A
xgoƚar/A
xgorbiar/A
degradar/A
dexgranar/A
dexgranfir/A
grasiar/A
agredir/A
xgrénđer/A
grevar/A
ingriñolir/A
xgrisoƚar/A
xgronsoƚar/A
guantar/A
xguaƚivar/A
xguilsar/A
inguxeƚar/A
indatejar/A
ingoxar/A
inprexonar/A
interisir/A
invenŧionar/A
abiurar/A
injarar/A
injavetar/A
jeƚomarar/A
xjinŧar/A
josar/A
xjoŧolar/A
dexjustar/A
skadenar/A
kaixar/A
kaƚefar/A
kalkidolar/A
kalŧar/A
kalumar/A
skanar/A
kànđer/A
skanpanar/A
kantuŧar/A
deskapeƚar/A
deskaprisiar/A
inkaratar/A
skargar/A
deskaroñar/A
skarteđar/A
skartosar/A
rekatar/A
inkatijar/A
inkasar/A
kauxar/A
skavalkar/A
skekeđar/A
inkodegar/A
deskoɉonar/A
inkolar/A
inkolorar/A
komenŧar/A
skomunegar/A
konglomerar/A
konpiƚar/A
kontenplar/A
akonŧar/A
skopelotar/A
traskórer/A
akòrxer/A
korèxer/A
eskorporar/A
skosar/A
inkoŧar/A
rekovèrxer/A
skrekolar/A
kriar/A
krokoƚar/A
inkrostoƚar/A
krupolixar/A
skuajar/A
deskuèrđer/A
inkuirar/A
kulatar/A
inkurar/A
inkuŧolar/A
ƚagremar/A
lanpar/A
ƚaoratar/A
xlargixar/A
dexlaŧar/A
xlavinar/A
relèder/A
deleguar/A
lestir/A
reƚevar/A
liberar/A
xlièxer/A
limegar/A
lisar/A
livelar/A
ƚogorar/A
ƚordar/A
xloxar/A
straƚunar/A
straƚúxer/A
maƚiñar/A
manganar/A
maravejar/A
marsir/A
matidar/A
inmaxerir/A
melar/A
xmeravejar/A
skométer/A
mirar/A
xmokajar/A
mónxer/A
mòrder/A
mosar/A
premunir/A
nanir/A
negridar/A
nojar/A
nuklear/A
ocar/A
oltrigar/A
opinar/A
inorpeƚar/A
pair/A
paƚar/A
palpar/A
spanpaƚar/A
preparar/A
parteŧipar/A
despastar/A
despasar/A
spekular/A
inpeliŧar/A
respénxer/A
peotar/A
pestolar/A
petufiar/A
strapiantar/A
despikar/A
piòver/A
inpisar/A
poder/A
inpomoƚar/A
despontar/A
popoƚar/A
potar/A
sopresar/A
profesar/A
punir/A
spusoƚir/A
rancinar/A
ratinar/A
inkuidir/A
reŧitar/A
dexriŧolar/A
interogar/A
interónper/A
dexruđenir/A
inruvidir/A
arsalar/A
salteƚar/A
saŧiar/A
scopixar/A
suseguir/A
selexar/A
sentensiar/A
disestar/A
desiɉilar/A
sitonar/A
skaraventar/A
skejar/A
deskorŧar/A
iskurir/A
soƚetar/A
sopođar/A
spaleđar/A
desperar/A
spinar/A
spronar/A
istalar/A
staxonar/A
stitikir/A
storpiar/A
strepitar/A
stuar/A
sufraɉar/A
suŧar/A
taketar/A
tardir/A
tavaneđar/A
preténder/A
stentar/A
retèñer/A
intersar/A
tiranejar/A
destonar/A
torkolar/A
retòrxer/A
trakanar/A
destrasinar/A
instremir/A
tripudiar/A
trusidar/A
inŧanpar/A
interŧéder/A
ŧénđer/A
sertar/A
sifolar/A
siolar/A
inŧokir/A
inŧupar/A
maluxar/A
valutar/A
stravaxar/A
velenar/A
venturar/A
resovèñer/A
xvergolar/A
konvèrter/A
invidar/A
vitaliđar/A
xvogasar/A
‘oltar/A
traxalir/A
xdrumar/A
xironar/A
inxojelar/A
esprímer/A
ŧirkumnavegar/A
inkonpir/A
subapaltar/A
inkontentar/A
makotar/A
xbarlukar/A
xgarneƚar/A
takolar/A
